North Carolina, session 2025, SB80.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Sections 1 and 2 of S.L. 2007-86, as amended by Section 1 of S.L.
2008-5 and Section 42 of S.L. 2013-410, read as rewritten:
"SECTION 1. The governing body of a city or town may adopt ordinances providing that
notice of public hearings and other required notices may be given through electronic means,
including, but not limited to, the Town's Internet site. Electronic notice may be in lieu of
traditional publication methods. Ordinances adopted pursuant to this section shall not supersede
any State law that requires notice by mail to certain classes of people or the posting of signs on
certain property and shall not alter the publication schedule for any public notice.
"SECTION 2. This act applies only to the Towns of Apex, Cary, Fuquay-Varina, Garner,
and Knightdale.Holly Springs, Knightdale, Morrisville, Rolesville, Wake Forest, Wendell, and
Zebulon."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S80-v-1*